Hawaii statutes.
§206E-3 Hawaii community
development authority; established. (a) There is
established the Hawaii community development authority, which shall be a body
corporate and a public instrumentality of the State, for the purpose of
implementing this chapter. The authority shall be placed within the department
of business, economic development, and tourism for administrative purposes.

(b)
The authority shall consist of the director of finance
or the director's designee; the director of transportation or the director's
designee; a cultural specialist; an at-large member; an at-large member
nominated by the senate president; an at-large member nominated by the speaker
of the house; three representatives of the Heeia community development
district, comprising two residents of that district or the Koolaupoko district,
which consists of sections 1 through 9 of zone 4 of the first tax map key
division, and one owner of a small business or one officer or director of a
nonprofit organization in the Heeia community development district or
Koolaupoko district, nominated by the county council of the county in which the
Heeia community development district is located; three representatives of the
Kalaeloa community development district, comprising two residents of the Ewa zone
(zone 9, sections 1 through 2) or the Waianae zone (zone 8, sections 1 through
9) of the first tax map key division, and one owner of a small business or one
officer or director of a nonprofit organization in the Ewa or Waianae zone,
nominated by the county council of the county in which the Kalaeloa community
development district is located; three representatives of the Kakaako community
development district, comprising two residents of the district and one owner of
a small business or one officer or director of a nonprofit organization in the
district, nominated by the county council of the county in which the Kakaako
community development district is located; the director of planning and
permitting of each county in which a community development district is located
or the director's designee, who shall serve in an ex officio, nonvoting
capacity; and the chairperson of the Hawaiian homes commission or the
chairperson's designee, who shall serve in an ex officio, nonvoting capacity.

All
members except the director of finance, director of transportation, county
directors of planning and permitting, and chairperson of the Hawaiian homes
commission or their designees shall be appointed by the governor pursuant to
section 26-34. The two at-large members nominated by the senate president and
speaker of the house and the nine representatives of the respective community
development districts shall each be appointed by the governor from a list of
three nominees submitted for each position by the nominating authority
specified in this subsection.

The
authority shall be organized and shall exercise jurisdiction as follows:

(1) For matters affecting the Heeia
community development district, the following members shall be considered in
determining quorum and majority and shall be eligible to vote:

(A) The director of finance or the director's
designee;

(B) The director of transportation or the
director's designee;

(C) The cultural specialist;

(D) The three at-large members; and

(E) The three representatives of the Heeia
community development district;

provided
that the director of planning and permitting of the relevant county or the
director's designee shall participate in these matters as an ex officio,
nonvoting member and shall not be considered in determining quorum and
majority;

(2) For matters affecting the Kalaeloa
community development district, the following members shall be considered in
determining quorum and majority and shall be eligible to vote:

(A) The director of finance or the director's
designee;

(B) The director of transportation or the
director's designee;

(C) The cultural specialist;

(D) The three at-large members; and

(E) The three representatives of the Kalaeloa
community development district;

provided
that the director of planning and permitting of the relevant county and the
chairperson of the Hawaiian homes commission, or their respective designees,
shall participate in these matters as ex officio, nonvoting members and shall
not be considered in determining quorum and majority;

(3) For matters affecting the Kakaako
community development district, the following members shall be considered in
determining quorum and majority and shall be eligible to vote:

(A) The director of finance or the director's
designee;

(B) The director of transportation or the
director's designee;

(C) The cultural specialist;

(D) The three at-large members; and

(E) The three representatives of the Kakaako
community development district;

provided
that the director of planning and permitting of the relevant county or the
director's designee shall participate in these matters as an ex officio,
nonvoting member and shall not be considered in determining quorum and
majority.

In the event of a vacancy, a member
shall be appointed to fill the vacancy in the same manner as the original
appointment within thirty days of the vacancy or within ten days of the
senate's rejection of a previous appointment, as applicable.

The terms of the director of finance,
director of transportation, county directors of planning and permitting, and
chairperson of the Hawaiian homes commission or their respective designees
shall run concurrently with each official's term of office. The terms of the
appointed voting members shall be for four years, commencing on July 1 and
expiring on June 30; provided that the initial terms of all voting members
initially appointed pursuant to Act 61, Session Laws of Hawaii 2014, shall
commence on March 1, 2015. The governor shall provide for staggered terms of
the initially appointed voting members so that the initial terms of four
members selected by lot shall be for two years, the initial terms of four
members selected by lot shall be for three years, and the initial terms of the
remaining five members shall be for four years.

The governor may remove or suspend
for cause any member after due notice and public hearing.

Notwithstanding section 92-15, a
majority of all eligible voting members as specified in this subsection shall
constitute a quorum to do business, and the concurrence of a majority of all
eligible voting members as specified in this subsection shall be necessary to
make any action of the authority valid. All members shall continue in office
until their respective successors have been appointed and qualified. Except as
herein provided, no member appointed under this subsection shall be an officer
or employee of the State or its political subdivisions.

For
purposes of this section, "small business" means a business which is
independently owned and which is not dominant in its field of operation.

(c) The authority shall
appoint the executive director who shall be the chief executive officer. The
authority shall set the salary of the executive director, who shall serve at
the pleasure of the authority and shall be exempt from chapter 76.

(d) The authority shall
annually elect the chairperson and vice chairperson from among its members.

(e) The members of the
authority appointed under subsection (b) shall serve without compensation, but
each shall be reimbursed for expenses, including travel expenses, incurred in
the performance of their duties. [L 1976, c 153, pt of §1; am L 1983, c 180,
§1; am L 1987, c 336, §7, c 339, §4, and c 355, §4; am L 1990, c 293, §8; am L
1993, c 311, §4; gen ch 1993; am L 2000, c 253, §150; am L 2002, c 184, §3; am
L 2006, c 252, §1; am L 2008, c 132, §2; am L 2012, c
323, §2; am L 2014, c 61, §3]

Attorney General Opinions

Subsection (b) is constitutional, with regard to the use of
the phrase "appointed and qualified" to describe when a successor's
appointment terminates a holdover member's position. Att. Gen. Op. 16-3.

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next